Wyoming, session 2026, HB0172.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 11-25-104(m) is amended to read:

11-25-104. Gaming commission; officers; director;
meetings; quorum; records; licenses generally; effect of
financial interest in events.

HB0172

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0339
(m) With respect to simulcasting permits, the
commission shall adopt rules to:

(i) Establish the number of actual live horse
racing or pari-mutuel event days required to qualify for a
simulcasting permit. The commission shall adopt rules
governing establishment of live horse racing or pari-mutuel
event days required for a simulcasting permit in a manner
that ensures as provided in this paragraph. Not less than
sixteen (16) of the live horse racing event days shall be
conducted on the permitted track for which the permitholder
was first authorized to conduct live horse racing to
qualify for a simulcasting permit under this act. The rules
shall ensure fair and equitable involvement of all affected
parties, including consideration of the economic viability
of those days to permit applicants;.

(ii) Specify requirements for historic horse
racing terminals operated under a simulcasting permit,
including all of the following:

(A) No permitholder shall be authorized to
operate additional terminals at any location in the state
HB0172

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0339
if the permitholder is authorized to operate one (1) or
more terminals under a simulcasting permit at any location
in the state that are not in use;

(B) On and after July 1, 2028, no
permitholder shall be authorized to operate more than the
following number of terminals in the state:

(I) One thousand two hundred (1,200)
terminals for each permitted track that is equal to or
greater than seven-eighths (7/8) of a mile in length and on
which the permitholder conducts a live horse racing day
required to qualify for a simulcasting permit under
paragraph (i) of this subsection;

(II) One thousand (1,000) terminals
for each permitted track that is less than seven-eighths
(7/8) of a mile in length and on which the permitholder
conducts a live horse racing day required to qualify for a
simulcasting permit under paragraph (i) of this subsection.

Section 2. The Wyoming gaming commission shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.
HB0172

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0339

Section 3.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0172